src/morphology/affixes/pron.lexc
! Pronouns affixes are still in the stems...

LEXICON PRON_BACK_CLIT

+Foc/han:%>han	# ;

+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>han%>kaan	# ;

+Foc/han+Foc/ko:%>han%>ko	# ;

+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>han%>pa	# ;

+Foc/kaan:%>kaan	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kaan%>han	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kaan%>kin	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/ko:%>kaan%>ko	# ;

+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kaan%>pa	# ;

+Foc/kin:%>kin	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>han	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kaan	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/ko:%>kin%>ko	# ;

+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pa	# ;

+Foc/ko:%>ko	# ;

+Foc/ko+Foc/han:%>ko%>han	# ;

+Foc/ko+Foc/kaan:%>ko%>kaan	# ;

+Foc/ko+Foc/kin:%>ko%>kin	# ;

+Foc/ko+Foc/pa:%>ko%>pa	# ;

+Foc/ko+Foc/s:%>ko%>s	# ;

+Foc/pa:%>pa	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pa%>han	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pa%>kaan	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pa%>kin	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/ko:%>pa%>ko	# ;

+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pa%>s	# ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT

:	# ;

:	PRON_BACK_CLIT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT_S

:	# ;

:	PRON_BACK_CLIT ;

:	PRON_BACK_CLIT_S ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_CLIT_S

+Foc/s:%>s	# ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>den	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>den	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>de	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>en	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>e	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IN

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>i%>n	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_IN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>i%>n	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen+Use/Arch:%>i	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tten	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tten	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>i%>tte	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN

+Pl+Gen:%>j%>en	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_N

+Sg+Gen:%>n	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN

+Pl+Gen:%>ten	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Gen:%>ten	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%>te	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN

+Sg+Ill:%>an	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill+Use/Arch:%>han	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN_OPTPOSS

+Sg+Ill:%>an	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%>a	PRON_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill+Use/Arch:%>han	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill+Use/Arch:%>ha	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN

+Sg+Ill:%>en	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill+Use/Arch:%>hen	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN_OPTPOSS

+Sg+Ill:%>en	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%>e	PRON_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ill+Use/Arch:%>hen	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill+Use/Arch:%>he	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON

+Sg+Ill:%>hon	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN

+Sg+Ill:%>hun	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hi	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill+Use/Arch:%>i%>hin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>i	PRON_BACK_POSS ;

+Pl+Ill+Use/Arch:%>i%>hin	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill+Use/Arch:%>i%>hi	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>siin	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>siin	PRON_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%>i%>sii	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN

+Sg+Ill:%>seen	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN

+Sg+Ill:%>un	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill+Use/Arch:%>hun	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_NOMINATIVE

+Sg+Nom:	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A

+Sg+Par:%>a	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN

+Sg+Par:%>a	PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;

+Sg+Par:	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_OPTPOSS

+Sg+Par:%>a	PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA

+Pl+Par:%>i%>a	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Par:%>i%>a	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA

+Pl+Par:%>i%>ta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Par:%>i%>ta	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA

+Pl+Par:%>j%>a	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA

+Sg+Par:%>ta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA_ARCHAIC

+Sg+Par+Use/Arch:%>ta	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA_OPTPOSS

+Sg+Par:%>ta	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PLNOM_0

+Pl+Nom:	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PLNOM_T

+Pl+Nom:%>t	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PLURALS

:	PRON_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;

:	PRON_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_PLURALS_OPTPOSS

:	PRON_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_OPTPOSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_POSS

+Px3:%>nsa	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl1:%>mme	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxPl2:%>nne	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg1:%>ni	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+PxSg2:%>si	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_POSS_AN

+Px3:%>an	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Px3+Use/Arch:%>han	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT

:	PRON_BACK_POSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN ;

:	PRON_BACK_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT

+Px3:%>en	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Px3+Use/Arch:%>hen	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

#;

LEXICON PRON_BACK_POSS_EN

+Px3:%>en	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Px3+Use/Arch:%>hen	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_POSS_EPRON_OBL

:	PRON_BACK_POSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_POSS_EN ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_POSS_EPRON_OPT

:	PRON_BACK_POSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_POSS_EN ;

:	PRON_BACK_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT

:	PRON_BACK_POSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_CLIT ;

:	# ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_SINGULARS

:	PRON_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

:	PRON_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS

:	PRON_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;

:	PRON_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS

+Pl+Ess:%>i%>na	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Com:%>i%>ne	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Ess:%>i%>na	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Com:%>i%>ne	PRON_BACK_POSS_EPRON_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS

+Sg+Ess:%>na	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Nom:	PRON_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Ess:%>na	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:	PRON_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Nom:	PRON_BACK_POSS ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS

+Pl+Abe:%>i%>tta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>lta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lla	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>sta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssa	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS_OPTPOSS

+Pl+Abe:%>i%>tta	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%>i%>lta	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%>i%>lla	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%>i%>lle	PRON_BACK_POSS_EPRON_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%>i%>sta	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%>i%>ssa	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%>i%>n	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>kse	PRON_BACK_POSS_EPRON_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%>i%>ksi	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS

+Sg+Abe:%>tta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%>lta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%>lla	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%>lle	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%>sta	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%>ssa	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:%>ksi	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:	PRON_BACK_PLNOM_T ;


LEXICON PRON_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS_OPTPOSS

+Sg+Abe:%>tta	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%>lta	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%>lla	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%>lle	PRON_BACK_POSS_EPRON_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%>sta	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%>ssa	PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:%>kse	PRON_BACK_POSS_EPRON_OBL ;

+Sg+Tra:%>ksi	PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:	PRON_BACK_PLNOM_T ;
