src/morphology/stems/pron.lexc
LEXICON PRONOUN
sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc:sinut  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ela+Use/NG+Dial/East:miusta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ela+Use/NG+Dial/East:siusta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
mä+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ess+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:muna   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
sä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Tra+Use/NG+Dial/Standard:suksi  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
tuo+Pron+Dem+Sg+Tra:tuoksi   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
toi+Pron+Dem+Sg+Abl:tolta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
kuka+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill:kuhun    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
kumpi+Pron+Interr+Pl+Tra:kummiksi    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
millainen+Pron+Interr+Pl+All:millaisille     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
millainen+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ess:millaisena  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
mones+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ess:monensina   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
mones+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:monennessa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
kuka+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela:kusta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
joka+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela:joista  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
joka+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ins+Use/NG:joinka  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
joka+Pron+Rel+Sg+All+Use/NG:jolleka     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
joka+Pron+Rel+Sg+Tra+Use/NG:joksika     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
joku+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abe:jottakutta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; ! 
jokin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl:joiltain  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; ! 
jokin+Pron+Indef+Pl+Par:joitain   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; ! 
jokin+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:jokin     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ; ! 
jokainen+Pron+Qu+Pl+Nom:jokaiset     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
kaikki+Pron+Qu+Pl+Abe:kaikitta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
kaikki+Pron+Qu+Sg+Ade:kaikella   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
kukin+Pron+Qu+Pl+Com:kuinekin    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
kukin+Pron+Qu+Sg+Ess:kunakin     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
harva+Pron+Qu+Pl+Gen:harvojen    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
harva+Pron+Qu+Sg+Ins:harvan  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
jokunen+Pron+Qu+Pl+Par:jokusia   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
muutama+Pron+Qu+Pl+Abl:muutamilta    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
muutama+Pron+Qu+Sg+All:muutamalle    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
moni+Pron+Qu+Pl+Ess:monina   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
moni+Pron+Qu+Sg+Ine:monessa  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
usea+Pron+Qu+Sg+Nom:usea     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
usein+Pron+Qu+Pl+Ill:useimpiin PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
jompikumpi+Pron+Qu+Indef+Pl+Ade:jommillakummilla     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
kumpikin+Pron+Qu+Pl+Gen:kumpienkin   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
molemmat+Pron+Qu+Pl+Tra:molemmiksi   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Abe:toisitta  PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Abl:toisilta  PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Ade:toisilla  PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+All:toisille  PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Com:toisine   PRON_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Ela:toisista  PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Ess:toisina   PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Gen:toisten   PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Ill:toisiin   PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Ine:toisissa  PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Ins:toisin    PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Nom:toiset    PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Par:toisia    PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Tra:toisiksi  PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Abe:toisetta  PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Abl:toiselta  PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ade:toisella  PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+All:toiselle  PRON_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ela:toisesta  PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ess:toisena   PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Gen:toisen    PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ill:toiseen   PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ine:toisessa  PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ins:toisen    PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Nom:toisen    PRON_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Par:toista    PRON_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Tra:toisekse  PRON_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;
jompi+Pron+Pl+Abl:jommilta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
monias+Pron+Sg+Gen:moniaan   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
monituinen+Pron+Sg+Par:monituista    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
muu+Pron+Pl+All:muille  PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
